dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/venetan.dic
cèfe/T0t0t1T2T3T7N0N2N7L0L2l0l2I5I7A0+0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:cefar
diƚadie/T0t1T2t3T3l0l2I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:diƚadiar
fònde/T0t0t1T2T3T7N0N7L0L2l0l2I5I7+0:0.0^6^9	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:fònder
gomie/T0t0t1T2t3T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:gomiar
rinkapèle/T0t0T2T3T7N0N2N7L0L2I5	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:rinkapelar dp:in dp:re
kavalke/T0t0t1T2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7A0-1+0*0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:kavalkar
krupoƚixe/T0t1T2T3l0l2I7*0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:krupoƚixar
lòlde/T0t0t1T2T3T7N0N2N7L0L2l0l2I5I7A0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:loldar
xmuxe/T0t0t1T2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7A0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:xmuxar dp:s
oŧioge/T0t0T2T3N0N2L0L2I5A0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:oŧiogar
inpotife/T0t0t1T2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7A0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:inpotifar dp:in
puòrte/T0t0t1T2T3T7N0N2N7L0L2l0l2I5I7A0@0-0+0:0.0^6	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:puortar
reme/T0t0t1T2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7A0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:remar
espremente/T0t0t1T2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7A0	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:esprementar
insendie/T0t0t1T2t3T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:insendiar dp:in
vageɉe/T0t0t1T2T3N0N2L0L2l0l2I5I7	po:verb vt:indicative+present is:third st:vageɉar
taré/I4	po:verb vt:indicative+future is:second is:plural st:vardar
tarí/I4	po:verb vt:indicative+future is:second is:plural st:vardar
steso/M2F0F3A0	po:pronoun_demonstrative_before_noun
kaorlòto/M2F0F3A0	po:adjective_qualificative
ƚamonato/M2F0F3	po:adjective_qualificative
erètego/M2M4F0F3A0	po:adjective_qualificative
òdio/M2M3	po:noun
rio/M3F0F3	po:adjective_qualificative
ŧimitèrio/M2M3Vp	po:noun
vertude/X1	po:noun is:femenine
dibitor/M1M2F0F1Bu	po:noun
fio/M3F0F3	po:noun
klèrego/M2M4F0F3A0	po:noun
prièso/M2F0F3A1A2A0-1	po:noun
mortiƚitade/X1	po:noun is:femenine
frekuente/X0A0Vr	po:adjective_qualificative is:neuter
konfaƚon/M1M2F0F1Bu	po:noun
deđun/M0M2A1B1Bu	po:noun
màstigo/M2M4	po:noun
entegritade/X1	po:noun is:femenine
kortexan/M0M2A1A2B1BuaZaSeLe7o0o1o2o3o4r0	po:noun st:korte
jara/F2eLe7e2Vp	po:noun is:femenine
kòmodo/M2F0F3-1+0*0^6	po:adjective_qualificative
napon/M1M2B1Bu	po:noun st:napa ds:on
prèsa/F2A2Ci	po:noun is:femenine
raso/M2A0iNoT	po:noun
tòrso/M2F0F3A1A2A0Cu	po:noun
degan/M0M2F0F3B1Bui1	po:noun
faŧilitade/X1	po:noun is:femenine
konpanio/M2F0F3o0o1o2o3o4*0-1	po:adjective_qualificative
mesaɉèr/M0M2Buv0	po:noun
avogar/M1M2F0F1Bui1	po:noun
xlibral/X0B1BuVx	po:adjective_qualificative is:neuter dp:s
noiso/M2F0F3A1A2A0e0e2	po:noun st:noviso ds:iŧo
uxurar/M0M2F0F3A1A2	po:adjective_qualificative al:uxolario al:uxular al:oxurar
piàtola/F2V0	po:adjective_qualificative is:femenine
nio/M3	po:noun st:nido al:ni’
luxurar/M0M2F0F3A1A2Vp	po:adjective_qualificative al:uxolario al:uxular al:oxurar
serpil/M0M2A1V0	po:noun
skalon/M1M2B1Bue0	po:noun st:skala ds:on
antipòrto/M2F0F3A0	po:noun
fregolin/M0M2BuV0	po:noun st:frégola ds:in
konprador/M1M2Buv0	po:noun
omisidial/X0B1BuVx	po:adjective_qualificative is:neuter
alínpego/M2M4F0F3	po:adjective_qualificative st:olínpego
grüato/M2A0	po:noun st:grua ds:ato
vilanesko/M2F0F3A0	po:adjective_qualificative st:vilan ds:esko
ƚibaraƚitade/X1	po:noun is:femenine
subvenŧion/F1F2B1BuV0	po:noun is:femenine
brio/M3	po:noun
xeƚante/X0	po:adjective_qualificative is:neuter
fentiŧa/F2V0	po:adjective_qualificative is:femenine
veƚaon/M1M2Bu	po:noun st:veƚaa ds:on
faltròko/M2F0F3A0	po:noun
fiabon/M1M2F0F1B1Bu	po:adjective_qualificative
infermiŧo/M2F0F3A1A2A0	po:adjective_qualificative
latonèr/M0M2Buv0	po:noun st:laton
xoɉeƚèr/M0M2Buv7	po:noun
kaspo/M2F0F3A1A2A0	po:adjective_qualificative
nevoxo/M2F0F3A0	po:adjective_qualificative
makarònigo/M2M4F0F3	po:adjective_qualificative
anđèlego/M2F0F3A0	po:adjective_qualificative
broñòla/F2v0	po:noun is:femenine
kondon/M0M2B1Bu	po:noun
palpuñon/M1M2F0F1B1Bu*0	po:adjective_qualificative st:palpuñar ds:on
poƚitegon/M1M2F0F1Bu	po:adjective_qualificative
scafaŧon/X0B1Bu	po:adjective_qualificative is:neuter
balkonièr/M0M2Buv0	po:noun
nisisitade/X1	po:noun is:femenine
dex-amigo/M2M4F0F3	po:adjective_qualificative
kuieta/F2iNuZuS+0	po:adjective_qualificative is:femenine
publegaŧion/F1F2B1BuV0	po:noun is:femenine st:publegar ds:ŧion
uliàdego/M2F0F3A0	po:adjective_qualificative
korparòl/M0M2B1v0	po:noun
skopeton/M1M2B1Bu	po:noun st:skopeta ds:on
xbaregon/M1M2F0F1B1Bu	po:noun
stufaròla/F2v0	po:noun is:femenine
tenpexin/M0M2Bu	po:noun
batelucante/X0A0	po:noun is:neuter
ađariòl/M0M2B1	po:noun
spolvaron/M1M2F0F1B1Bu	po:noun
gonfiamento/M2A0Vr-1*0	po:noun ds:mento
lexitimo/M2F0F3A0	po:adjective_qualificative
prosimaŧion/F1F2B1BuV0	po:noun is:femenine st:prosimar ds:ŧion
caldin/M0M2Bu	po:noun
